Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Contracts With the United States or Its Agencies
[Repealed]

§§ 43-33-81 through 43-33-91.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1980, ch. 441, § 5, eff from and after its passage (approved May 2, 1980).

§43-33-81. [En Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 27]

§43-33-83. [En Laws, 1966, ch. 600, § 1]

§43-33-85. [En Laws, 1966, ch. 600, § 2]

§43-33-87. [En Laws, 1966, ch. 600, § 3]

§43-33-89. [En Laws, 1966, ch. 600, § 4]

§43-33-91. [En Laws, 1966, ch. 600, § 5]